Washington statutes.
RCW 18.34.060

Dispensing optician.

A dispensing optician is a person who prepares duplications of, or prepares and dispenses lenses, spectacles, eyeglasses and/or appurtenances thereto to the intended wearers thereof on written prescriptions from physicians or optometrists, and in accordance with such prescriptions, measures, adapts, adjusts and fabricates such lenses, spectacles, eyeglasses and/or appurtenances thereto to the human face for the aid or correction of visual or ocular anomalies of the human eye: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That contact lenses may be fitted only upon a written prescription of a physician or optometrist.

[ 1957 c 43 s 6.]